Oklahoma, session 2026, SB386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7-140 of Title 26, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. The state or a political subdivision shall not enact or

adopt any voting method that:

1. Allows qualified electors to rank candidates for any

federal, state, or local office in order of preference; and

2. Tabulates ballots cast in multiple rounds following the

elimination of a candidate until a single candidate attains a

majority.



Req. No. 1577 Page 1

B. Any ordinance enacted or adopted by a county, municipality,

school board, or other political subdivision that conflicts with the

requirements of subsection A of this section shall be void.

C. The prohibitions of this section shall not apply to the

internal processes of a political party including, but not limited

to, conventions, election of party officers, or other non-public

procedures by the party.

D. The Attorney General shall have the authority to enforce the

provisions of this section.

E. Any person aggrieved by a violation of this section may

bring a civil action for declaratory or injunctive relief. An

aggrieved person includes, but is not limited to, a candidate

running for office, a voter, or an election official operating under

a ranked choice election. The court may award court costs and

reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party.

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-1577 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:50 PM







Req. No. 1577 Page 2